Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 15 The Insurance Contract

Policy, excluding coverage for loss due to “water damage” resulting from “surface water,”

did not cover damage resulting from the entrance of water and hail into the basement of the insured's house after a severe storm. State Farm Fire & Casualty Co. v. Paulson, 756 P.2d 764,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1988).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 183 to 476.

Insurance: subrogation of insurer compensating owner or contractor for loss under “builder's risk” policy against allegedly negligent contractor or subcontractor, 22 ALR4th 701.

Insurer's duty, and effect of its failure, to provide insured or payee with copy of policy or other adequate documentation of its terms, 78 ALR4th 9.

Validity, construction, and effect of assault and battery exclusion in liability insurance policy at issue, 44 ALR5th 91.

What constitutes “suit” triggering insurer's duty to defend environmental claims — state cases, 48 ALR5th 355.

44 C.J.S. Insurance §§ 253 to 356; 45 C.J.S. Insurance §§ 357 to 435.